Maryland, session 2026, HB0194.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Correctional Services
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0194*

HOUSE BILL 194
SUBTITLE 9. INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM.
3–901.
IN THIS SUBTITLE, “APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM” MEANS THE
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM.
3–902.
(A) THERE IS AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM
IN THE DEPARTMENT.
(B) THE APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM IS AN INDEPENDENT PROGRAM THAT
IS SEPARATE FROM MARYLAND CORRECTIONAL ENTERPRISES UNDER SUBTITLE 5
OF THIS TITLE.
3–903.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP AN APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM TO
PROVIDE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS THE OPPORTUNITY TO SERVE AS PAID
APPRENTICES IN AN AGENCY OR A UNIT OF STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT OR WITH
A PRIVATE ENTITY.
(B) THE APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM SHALL PRIORITIZE EMPLOYMENT IN
SKILLED TRADES WITH THE PURPOSE OF ASSISTING INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS
TO DEVELOP MARKETABLE JOB SKILLS AND TO PROVIDE INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUALS WITH THE OPPORTUNITY TO EARN MONEY THAT CAN BE USED ONCE
THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL IS RELEASED FROM INCARCERATION.
(C) EMPLOYERS PARTICIPATING IN THE APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM MAY
INCLUDE AN AGENCY OR A UNIT OF STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT AND PRIVATE
ENTITIES.
(D) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL MAKE ASSIGNMENTS FOR
APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM PARTICIPANTS TO ELIGIBLE EMPLOYERS WHO ARE
PARTICIPATING IN THE APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM.
(2) AN EMPLOYER MAY REJECT THE DEPARTMENT’S PROPOSED
ASSIGNMENT OR CEASE PARTICIPATION IN THE APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM AT ANY
TIME.
3–904.

HOUSE BILL 194 3
(A) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, AN EMPLOYER WHO IS
A PARTICIPANT IN THE APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM SHALL DETERMINE THE WAGE
PAID TO AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL.
(B) A PERSON THAT EMPLOYS AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL UNDER THIS
SECTION SHALL PAY A COMPENSATION RATE OF NOT LESS THAN THE STATE
MINIMUM WAGE UNDER § 3–413(C) OF THE LABOR AND EMPLOYMENT ARTICLE.
(C) AN EMPLOYER WHO IS AN APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM PARTICIPANT
SHALL PAY TO THE DEPARTMENT THE AMOUNT AGREED ON WITH THE
DEPARTMENT, AS PART OF THE AGREEMENT FOR THE APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM,
FOR EACH DAY THAT AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL IS EMPLOYED AS PART OF THE
APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM.
(D) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
FROM THE PAYMENTS MADE UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL CREDIT THE AMOUNT HELD TO THE ACCOUNT OF THE
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL UNDER § 3–609 OF THIS TITLE, AS DETERMINED BY THE
DEPARTMENT.
(2) IF THE DEPARTMENT FINDS THAT THE SPOUSE, CHILD, OR OTHER
DEPENDENT OF AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL NEEDS FINANCIAL SUPPORT, THE
DEPARTMENT MAY PAY ALL OR PART OF THE PAYMENTS MADE UNDER SUBSECTION
(C) OF THIS SECTION, AS THE DEPARTMENT CONSIDERS PROPER, TO THE SPOUSE,
CHILD, OR OTHER DEPENDENT.
3–905.
(A) THE DIVISION OF CORRECTION SHALL PROVIDE, OR MAKE
ARRANGEMENTS THAT IT CONSIDERS TO BE ADEQUATE AND PROPER TO PROVIDE,
FOR THE GUARDING, TRANSPORTING, LODGING, FEEDING, CLOTHING, AND MEDICAL
AND OTHER CARE OF AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL WHILE THE INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL IS PARTICIPATING IN THE APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM.
(B) (1) FOR AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL ASSIGNED TO AN AGENCY OR
A UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT AS A PARTICIPANT IN THE APPRENTICESHIP
PROGRAM, THE STATE SHALL PAY THE EXPENSES INCURRED UNDER SUBSECTION
(A) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) FOR AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL ASSIGNED TO A MUNICIPAL
CORPORATION, COUNTY, OR PRIVATE ENTITY AS A PARTICIPANT IN THE
APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM, THE MUNICIPAL CORPORATION, COUNTY, OR PRIVATE

HOUSE BILL 194
ENTITY SHALL PAY THE EXPENSES INCURRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION UNDER ARRANGEMENTS MADE WITH OR SATISFACTORY TO THE
DEPARTMENT.
3–906.
AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL PARTICIPATING IN THE APPRENTICESHIP
PROGRAM IS ENTITLED TO THE SAME DEDUCTIONS OR ALLOWANCES FOR GOOD
BEHAVIOR, OBSERVANCE OF DISCIPLINE AND RULES, AND DILIGENT AND FAITHFUL
LABOR AND IS SUBJECT TO THE SAME FORFEITURES OR PUNISHMENTS FOR BAD
BEHAVIOR AND OTHER VIOLATIONS THAT OTHERWISE APPLY TO INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUALS UNDER THE LAWS OF THE STATE.
3–907.
IF AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL SUCCESSFULLY COMPLETES THE
APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM, WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE SCHEDULED RELEASE OF
THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE THE
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL WITH A CERTIFICATE DEMONSTRATING THE
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL’S SUCCESSFUL COMPLETION OF THE APPRENTICESHIP
PROGRAM.
3–908.
THE DEPARTMENT MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THE
PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Department” means the Department of Public Safety and Correctional
Services.
(3) “Program” means the Incarcerated Individual Apprenticeship Pilot
Program.
(b) (1) There is an Incarcerated Individual Apprenticeship Pilot Program in
the Department.
(2) The Program is an independent program that is separate from
Maryland Correctional Enterprises under Title 3, Subtitle 5 of the Correctional Services
Article.

HOUSE BILL 194 5
(c) The Department, in consultation with the Department of Labor, shall develop
the Program to provide incarcerated individuals at the Baltimore City Correctional Center
the opportunity to serve as paid apprentices in an agency or a unit of State or local
government or with a private entity.
(d) The Department shall make assignments for Program participants to eligible
employers who are participating in the Program.
(e) A person that employs an incarcerated individual under the Program shall
pay a compensation rate of not less than the State minimum wage under § 3–413(c) of the
Labor and Employment Article.
(f) The Division of Correction shall provide for, or make arrangements that it
considers to be adequate and proper to provide for, the guarding, transporting, lodging,
feeding, clothing, and medical and other care of an incarcerated individual while the
incarcerated individual is participating in the Program.
(g) If an incarcerated individual successfully completes the Program, prior to the
individual’s scheduled release, the Department or the Program shall provide the
incarcerated individual with a certificate demonstrating the incarcerated individual’s
successful completion of the Program.
(h) On or before January 1, 2029, the Department shall report to the General
Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, on the
implementation of this section.
(i) The Department may adopt regulations to carry out the provisions of this Act.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 3 years and, at the end of September
30, 2029, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.